Missouri, session 2026, HB2193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 455, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 455.096, to read as follows:
455.096. 1. In addition to any other jurisdictional grounds provided by law, a
court shall have jurisdiction to enter an extreme risk order of protection restraining or
enjoining a respondent from possessing any firearms.
2. (1) Upon the filing of a verified petition by a law enforcement officer or
agency under this section, and for good cause shown in the petition, the court may
immediately issue an ex parte order of protection. An immediate and present danger of
the respondent causing personal injury to himself or herself or others shall constitute
good cause shown for purposes of this section. An ex parte order of protection entered
by the court shall take effect when entered and shall remain in effect until there is valid
service of process and a hearing is held on the motion within fifteen days of the filing of
the petition.
(2) Failure to serve an ex parte order of protection on the respondent shall not
affect the validity or enforceability of such order. If the respondent is under eighteen
years of age, unless otherwise emancipated, service of process shall be made upon a
custodial parent or guardian of the respondent, or upon a guardian ad litem appointed
by the court, requiring that the person appear and bring the respondent before the
court at the time and place stated.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2193 2
(3) If an ex parte order is entered and the respondent is under eighteen years of
age, the court shall transfer the case to juvenile court for a hearing on a full order of
protection. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for any such respondent not
represented by a parent or guardian.
(4) The law enforcement officer or agency shall be responsible for providing
notice to a family or household member of the respondent and to any known third party
who may be at risk of violence. The notice shall state that the law enforcement officer or
agency intends to petition the court for an extreme risk order of protection or has
already done so, and include referrals to appropriate resources, including mental health,
domestic violence, and counseling resources. The law enforcement officer or agency
shall attest in the petition to having provided such notice, or attest to the steps that shall
be taken to provide such notice.
3. Upon issuance of any ex parte order of protection under subsection 2 of this
section, the court shall order the respondent to surrender to the local law enforcement
agency where the respondent resides all firearms in the respondent's custody, control, or
possession. The law enforcement officer serving any ex parte order of protection shall
provide the respondent to the order an opportunity to comply with the order by
surrendering all firearms in his or her custody, control, or possession. If the respondent
does not comply, the law enforcement officer serving the order shall conduct a lawful
search and seizure of any firearms of the respondent and in any area where probable
cause exists that a firearm to be surrendered under the order is located. The law
enforcement agency shall hold all surrendered firearms until a hearing is held on the
petition for the extreme risk order of protection. Such firearms shall not be held for
more than one hundred twenty days unless the court issues a full extreme risk order of
protection as provided in this section.
4. Not later than fifteen days after the filing of a verified petition that meets the
requirements of this section, a hearing shall be held unless the court deems, for good
cause shown, that a continuance should be granted. At the hearing, if the law
enforcement officer or agency has proved the allegation that the respondent poses a
significant danger to himself or herself or others by a preponderance of the evidence, the
court shall issue a full extreme risk order of protection for a period of one year.
5. (1) Upon issuance of any full extreme risk order of protection under
subsection 4 of this section, the court shall order the respondent to surrender to the local
law enforcement agency where the respondent resides all firearms in the respondent's
custody, control, or possession. If the respondent has been identified in the petition as
being required to carry a firearm as a condition of the respondent's employment, the
court shall notify the respondent's employer of the existence of the order. If the

HB 2193 3
respondent holds a concealed carry permit under section 571.101, the court shall order a
revocation of the concealed carry permit.
(2) The law enforcement officer serving any extreme risk order of protection
shall provide the respondent to the order an opportunity to comply with the order by
surrendering all firearms in his or her custody, control, or possession. If the respondent
does not comply, the law enforcement officer serving the order shall:
(a) Conduct a lawful search of the respondent and any area where probable
cause exists that a firearm to be surrendered under the order is located; and
(b) Take possession of all firearms belonging to the respondent that are
surrendered in plain sight or discovered under a lawful search conducted under
paragraph (a) of this subdivision.
(3) If personal service by a law enforcement officer is not possible or not
required because the respondent was present at the extreme risk order of protection
hearing, the respondent shall surrender the firearms in a safe manner to the control of
the local law enforcement agency within forty-eight hours of being served with the order
by alternate service or within forty-eight hours of the hearing or final decision at which
the respondent was present.
(4) At the time of surrender, a law enforcement officer taking possession of a
firearm shall issue a receipt identifying all firearms that have been surrendered and
provide a copy of the receipt to the respondent. Within seventy-two hours after service
of the order, the officer serving the order shall file the original receipt with the court and
shall ensure that his or her law enforcement agency retains a copy of the receipt.
(5) Upon the sworn statement or testimony of any law enforcement officer
alleging that the respondent has failed to comply with the surrender of firearms as
required by an order issued under this subsection and subsection 3 of this section, the
court shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the respondent has
failed to surrender all firearms in his or her possession, custody, or control. If probable
cause exists, the court shall issue a warrant describing the firearms and authorizing a
search of the locations where the firearms are reasonably believed to be and the seizure
of any firearms discovered pursuant to such search.
(6) If a person other than the respondent claims title to any firearms
surrendered under this subsection and subsection 3 of this section and he or she is
determined by the law enforcement agency to be the lawful owner of the firearm, the
firearm shall be returned to him or her, provided that:
(a) The firearm is removed from the respondent's custody, control, or possession
and the lawful owner agrees to store the firearm in a manner such that the respondent
does not have access to or control of the firearm; and

HB 2193 4
(b) The firearm is not otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner.
(7) A respondent to an extreme risk order of protection may file a motion to
modify or rescind that order of protection. The respondent may request a hearing on
such a motion with the court that issued the original extreme risk order of protection.
The court shall conduct a hearing on the motion to modify or rescind an extreme risk
order of protection within fifteen days after the motion is filed. At the hearing, if the
respondent has proved by a preponderance of the evidence that the extreme risk order
of protection should be modified or rescinded, the court shall modify or rescind the
100 extreme risk order of protection.
101 6. If an extreme risk order of protection is terminated or expires without
102 renewal, a law enforcement agency holding any firearm that has been surrendered
103 under subsections 3 and 5 of this section shall return any surrendered firearm requested
104 by a respondent only after confirming through a background check administered by the
105 state highway patrol under section 43.543 that the respondent is currently eligible to
106 own or possess firearms under federal and state law and after confirming with the court
107 that the extreme risk order of protection has terminated or has expired without renewal.
108 7. (1) The law enforcement officer or agency may renew the extreme risk order
109 of protection if probable cause is shown that the respondent continues to pose a
110 significant risk of personal injury to himself or herself or others by possessing a firearm.
111 The extreme risk order of protection may be renewed for up to one year from the
112 expiration of the preceding extreme risk order of protection. Written notice of a
113 hearing on the motion to renew an extreme risk order of protection shall be given to the
114 respondent by the court.
115 (2) A law enforcement agency shall, if requested, provide prior notice of the
116 return of a firearm to a respondent or to family or household members of the
117 respondent.
118 (3) Any firearm surrendered by a respondent under subsections 3 and 5 of this
119 section that remains unclaimed by the lawful owner shall be disposed of in accordance
120 with the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures for the disposal of firearms
121 in police custody.
122 8. The clerk of any court that issues an extreme risk order of protection shall
123 send the Missouri state highway patrol a copy of the order issued by that court within
124 forty-eight hours of the court issuing the order. Upon receiving an extreme risk order of
125 protection, the Missouri state highway patrol shall enter the extreme risk order of
126 protection into the Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES) within forty-
127 eight hours of receiving notice of the order.

HB 2193 5
128 9. A violation of the terms and conditions of an ex parte order of protection
129 under this section of which the respondent has notice shall be a class A misdemeanor
130 unless the respondent has previously pled guilty to or has been found guilty in any
131 division of the circuit court of violating an ex parte order of protection or a full order of
132 protection within five years of the date of the subsequent violation, in which case the
133 subsequent violation shall be a class E felony. Evidence of prior pleas of guilty or
134 findings of guilt shall be heard by the court out of the presence of the jury prior to
135 submission of the case to the jury. If the court finds the existence of such prior pleas of
136 guilty or findings of guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, the court shall decide the extent or
137 duration of sentence or other disposition and shall not instruct the jury as to the range
138 of punishment or allow the jury to assess and declare the punishment as a part of its
139 verdict.
140 10. A violation of the terms and conditions of a full order of protection under this
141 section shall be a class A misdemeanor unless the respondent has previously pled guilty
142 to or has been found guilty in any division of the circuit court of violating an ex parte
143 order of protection or a full order of protection within five years of the date of the
144 subsequent violation, in which case the subsequent violation shall be a class E felony.
145 Evidence of prior pleas of guilty or findings of guilt shall be heard by the court out of the
146 presence of the jury prior to submission of the case to the jury. If the court finds the
147 existence of such prior plea of guilty or finding of guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, the
148 court shall decide the extent or duration of the sentence or other disposition and shall
149 not instruct the jury as to the range of punishment or allow the jury to assess and
150 declare the punishment as a part of its verdict. For the purposes of this subsection, in
151 addition to the notice provided by actual service of the order, a party is deemed to have
152 notice of an order of protection if:
153 (1) The law enforcement officer responding to a call of a reported violation of an
154 order of protection presented a copy of the order of protection to the respondent; or
155 (2) Notice is given by actual communication to the respondent in a manner
156 reasonably likely to advise the respondent.
✔